Utah statutes.
58-80a-304.   Term of certification -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1)  The division shall issue each certification under this chapter in
accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  The division
may by rule extend or shorten a renewal cycle by as much as one year to
stagger the renewal cycles that the division administers.
(2)  Each certification automatically expires on the expiration date shown on
the certification unless the certified medical language interpreter renews the
certification in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
